California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(b) A single service upon or mailing to one of several
persons having a common business or residence address is sufficient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1268.230.

By taking possession pursuant to this article, the plaintiff does not waive the right to appeal from the judgment, the right to move to abandon, or the right to request a new trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1268.240.

Nothing in this article limits the right of a public entity to exercise its police power in emergency situations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Interest [1268.310. - 1268.360.]

1268.310.

The compensation awarded in the proceeding shall draw interest, computed as prescribed by Section 1268.350, from the earliest of the following dates:

(a) The date of entry of judgment.

(b) The date the plaintiff takes possession of the property.

(c) The date after which the plaintiff is authorized to take possession of the property as stated in an order for possession.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1372, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1268.311.

In any inverse condemnation proceeding in which interest is awarded, the interest shall be computed as prescribed by Section 1268.350.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1372, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1268.320.

The compensation awarded in the proceeding shall cease to draw interest at the earliest of the following dates:

(a) As to any amount deposited pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1255.010) of Chapter 6 (deposit of probable compensation prior to judgment), the date such amount is withdrawn by the person entitled thereto.

(b) As to the amount deposited in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 1268.110) (deposit of amount of award), the date of such deposit.

(c) As to any amount paid to the person entitled thereto, the date of such payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1268.330.

If, after the date that interest begins to accrue, the defendant:

(a) Continues in actual possession of the property, the value of that possession shall be offset against the interest. For the purpose of this section, the value of possession of the property shall be presumed to be the rate of interest calculated as prescribed by Section 1268.350 on the compensation awarded. This presumption is one affecting the burden of proof.

(b) Receives rents or other income from the property attributable to the period after interest
begins to accrue, the net amount of these rents and other income shall be offset against the interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1372, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1268.340.

Interest, including interest accrued due to possession of property by the plaintiff prior to judgment, and any offset against interest as provided in Section 1268.330, shall be assessed by the court rather than by jury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1268.350.

(a) As used in this section, “apportionment rate” means the apportionment rate calculated by the Controller as the rate of earnings by the Surplus Money Investment Fund for each calendar quarter.

(b) The rate of interest payable under this article for each calendar quarter, or fraction thereof, for which interest is due, shall be the apportionment rate for the immediately preceding calendar quarter.

(c) Each district office of the Department of Transportation shall quote the apportionment rate to any person upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 311, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1268.360.

The interest payable for each calendar quarter shall draw interest, computed as prescribed by Section 1268.350, in each succeeding calendar quarter for which interest is due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 311, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Proration of Property Taxes [1268.410. - 1268.450.]

1268.410.

As between the plaintiff and defendant, the plaintiff is liable for any ad valorem taxes, penalties, and costs upon property acquired by eminent domain prorated from and including the date of apportionment determined pursuant to Section 5082 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1268.420.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b):

(1) If the acquisition of property by eminent domain will make the property exempt property as defined in Section 5081 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, any ad valorem taxes, penalties, or costs on the property for which the plaintiff is liable pursuant to Section 1268.410 are not collectible.

(2) If the acquisition of property by eminent domain will not make the property exempt property as defined in Section 5081 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the plaintiff shall be deemed
to be the assessee for the purposes of collection of any ad valorem taxes, penalties, and costs on the property for which the plaintiff is liable pursuant to Section 1268.410.

(b) To the extent there is a dismissal or partial dismissal of the eminent domain proceeding, the amount of any unpaid ad valorem taxes, penalties, and costs on the property for which the plaintiff would be liable pursuant to Section 1268. 410 until the entry of judgment of dismissal shall be awarded to the defendant. The amount awarded shall be paid to the tax collector from the award or, if unpaid for any reason, are collectible from the defendant.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1268.430.

(a) If the defendant has paid any amount for which, as between the plaintiff and defendant, the plaintiff is liable under this article, the plaintiff shall pay to the defendant a sum equal to such amount.

(b) The amount the defendant is entitled to be paid under this section shall be claimed in the manner provided for claiming costs and at the following times: 

(1) If the plaintiff took possession of the property prior to judgment, at the time provided for claiming costs.

(2) If the plaintiff did not take possession of the property prior to judgment, not later than 30 days after the plaintiff took title to the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1268.440.

(a) If taxes have been paid on property that is exempt property as defined in Section 5081 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the amount of the taxes that, if unpaid, would have been subject to cancellation under Article 5 (commencing with Section 5081) of Chapter 4 of Part 9 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be deemed to be erroneously collected and shall be refunded in the manner provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 5096) of Chapter 5 of Part 9 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code to the person who paid the taxes.

(b) The public entity shall be
deemed to be the person who paid the taxes if the public entity reimbursed the defendant for the taxes under a cost bill filed in the eminent domain proceeding pursuant to Section 1268.430. A claim for refund of taxes filed by a public entity pursuant to this section shall contain a copy of the cost bill under which taxes were reimbursed or a declaration under penalty of perjury by the public entity that the taxes were reimbursed under a cost bill.

(c) Taxes paid on either the secured or unsecured roll may be refunded pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1268.450.

If property acquired by eminent domain does not have a separate valuation on the assessment roll, any party to the eminent domain proceeding may, at any time after the taxes on the property are subject to cancellation under Article 5 (commencing with Section 5081) of Chapter 4 of Part 9 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, apply to the tax collector for a separate valuation of the property in accordance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 2821) of Chapter 3 of Part 5 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code notwithstanding any provision in that article to the contrary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Abandonment [1268.510. - 1268.510.]

1268.510.

(a) At any time after the filing of the complaint and before the expiration of 30 days after final judgment, the plaintiff may wholly or partially abandon the proceeding by serving on the defendant and filing in court a written notice of such abandonment.

(b) The court may, upon motion made within 30 days after the filing of such notice, set the abandonment aside if it determines that the position of the moving party has been substantially changed to his detriment in justifiable reliance upon the proceeding and such party cannot be restored to substantially the same position as if
the proceeding had not been commenced.

(c) Upon denial of a motion to set aside such abandonment or, if no such motion is filed, upon the expiration of the time for filing such a motion, the court shall, on motion of any party, enter judgment wholly or partially dismissing the proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Litigation Expenses and Damages Upon Dismissal or Defeat of Right to Take [1268.610. - 1268.620.]

1268.610.

(a) Subject to subdivisions (b) and (c), the court shall award the defendant his or her litigation expenses whenever:

(1) The proceeding is wholly or partly dismissed for any reason.

(2) Final judgment in the proceeding is that the plaintiff cannot acquire property it sought to acquire in the proceeding.

(b) Where there is a partial dismissal
or a final judgment that the plaintiff cannot acquire a portion of the property originally sought to be acquired, or a dismissal of one or more plaintiffs pursuant to Section 1260.020, the court shall award the defendant only those litigation expenses, or portion thereof, that would not have been incurred had the property sought to be acquired following the dismissal or judgment been the property originally sought to be acquired.

(c) If the plaintiff files a notice of abandonment as to a particular defendant, or a request for dismissal of a particular defendant, and the court determines that the defendant did not own or have any interest in the property that the plaintiff sought to acquire in the proceeding, the court shall award that defendant only those litigation expenses incurred up to the time of filing the notice of abandonment or request for dismissal.

(d) Litigation
expenses under this section shall be claimed in and by a cost bill to be prepared, served, filed, and taxed as in a civil action. If the proceeding is dismissed upon motion of the plaintiff, the cost bill shall be filed within 30 days after notice of entry of judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 192, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1268.620.

If, after the defendant moves from property in compliance with an order or agreement for possession or in reasonable contemplation of its taking by the plaintiff, the proceeding is dismissed with regard to that property for any reason or there is a final judgment that the plaintiff cannot acquire that property, the court shall:

(a) Order the plaintiff to deliver possession of the property to the persons entitled to it; and

(b) Make such provision as shall be just for the payment of all damages proximately caused by the proceeding and its
dismissal as to that property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Costs [1268.710. - 1268.720.]

1268.710.

The defendants shall be allowed their costs, including the costs of determining the apportionment of the award made pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1260.220, except that the costs of determining any issue as to title between two or more defendants shall be borne by the defendants in such proportion as the court may direct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1268.720.

Unless the court otherwise orders, whether or not he is the prevailing party, the defendant in the proceeding shall be allowed his costs on appeal. This section does not apply to an appeal involving issues between defendants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Arbitration of Compensation in Acquisitions of Property for Public Use [1273.010. - 1273.050.]

1273.010.

(a) Any person authorized to acquire property for public use may enter into an agreement to arbitrate any controversy as to the compensation to be made in connection with the acquisition of the property.

(b) Where property is already appropriated to a public use, the person authorized to compromise or settle the claim arising from a taking or damaging of such property for another public use may enter into an agreement to arbitrate any controversy as to the compensation to be made in connection with such taking or damaging.

(c) For the purposes of this section, in the case of a public entity, “person” refers to the particular department, officer, commission, board, or governing body authorized to acquire property on behalf of the public entity or to compromise or settle a claim arising from the taking or damaging of the entity’s property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1273.020.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 1283.2 and 1284.2, the party acquiring the property shall pay all of the expenses and fees of the neutral arbitrator and the statutory fees and mileage of all witnesses subpoenaed in the arbitration, together with other expenses of the arbitration incurred or approved by the neutral arbitrator, not including attorney’s fees or expert witness fees or other expenses incurred by other parties for their own benefit.

(b) An agreement authorized by this chapter may require that the party acquiring the property pay reasonable attorney’s fees or expert witness
 fees, or both, to any other party to the arbitration. If the agreement requires the payment of such fees, the amount of the fees is a matter to be determined in the arbitration proceeding unless the agreement prescribes otherwise.

(c) The party acquiring the property may pay the expenses and fees referred to in subdivisions (a) and (b) from funds available for the acquisition of the property or other funds available for the purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1273.030.

(a) Except as specifically provided in this chapter, agreements authorized by this chapter are subject to Title 9 (commencing with Section 1280) of this part.

(b) An agreement authorized by this chapter may be made whether or not an eminent domain proceeding has been commenced to acquire the property. If a proceeding has been commenced or is commenced, any petition or response relating to the arbitration shall be filed and determined in the proceeding.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 1281.4, an agreement authorized by this
 chapter does not waive or restrict the power of any person to commence and prosecute an eminent domain proceeding, including the taking of possession prior to judgment, except that, upon motion of a party to the proceeding, the court shall stay the determination of compensation until any petition for an order to arbitrate is determined and, if arbitration is ordered, until arbitration is had in accordance with the order.

(d) The effect and enforceability of an agreement authorized by this chapter is not defeated or impaired by contention or proof by any party to the agreement that the party acquiring the property pursuant to the agreement lacks the power or capacity to take the property by eminent domain.

(e) Notwithstanding the rules as to venue provided by Sections 1292 and 1292.2, any petition relating to arbitration authorized by this chapter shall be filed in the superior
 court in the county in which the property, or any portion of the property, is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1273.040.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), an agreement authorized by this chapter may specify the terms and conditions under which the party acquiring the property may abandon the acquisition, the arbitration proceeding, and any eminent domain proceeding that may have been, or may be, filed. Unless the agreement provides that the acquisition may not be abandoned, the party acquiring the property may abandon the acquisition, the arbitration proceeding, and any eminent domain proceeding at any time not later than the time for filing and serving a petition or response to vacate an arbitration award under Sections 1288, 1288.2, and 1290.6.

(b) If the proceeding to acquire the property is abandoned after the arbitration agreement is executed, the party from whom the property was to be acquired is entitled to recover (1) all expenses reasonably and necessarily incurred (i) in preparing for the arbitration proceeding and for any judicial proceedings in connection with the acquisition of the property, (ii) during the arbitration proceeding and during any judicial proceedings in connection with the acquisition, and (iii) in any subsequent judicial proceedings in connection with the acquisition and (2) reasonable attorney’s fees, appraisal fees, and fees for the services of other experts where such fees were reasonably and necessarily incurred to protect his interests in connection with the acquisition of the property. Unless the agreement otherwise provides, the amount of such
 expenses and fees shall be determined by arbitration in accordance with the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1273.050.

(a) An agreement authorized by this chapter may be acknowledged and recorded, and rerecorded, in the same manner and with the same effect as a conveyance of real property except that two years after the date the agreement is recorded, or rerecorded, the record ceases to be notice to any person for any purpose.

(b) In lieu of recording the agreement, there may be recorded a memorandum thereof, executed by the parties to the agreement, containing at least the following information: the names of the parties to the agreement, a description of the property, and a statement that an
 arbitration agreement affecting such property has been entered into pursuant to this chapter. Such memorandum when acknowledged and recorded, or rerecorded, in the same manner as a conveyance of real property has the same effect as if the agreement itself were recorded or rerecorded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 8. CHANGE OF NAMES [1275. - 1279.6.]

1275.

Applications for change of names must be determined by the Superior Courts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 486, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1276.

(a) (1) All applications for change of names shall be made to the superior court of the county where the person whose name is proposed to be changed resides, except as specified in subdivision (e) or (g), either (A) by petition signed by the person or, if the person is under 18 years of age, by one of the person’s parents, by any guardian of the person, or as specified in subdivision (e), or, if both parents are deceased and there is no guardian of the person, then by some near relative or friend of the person, or (B) as provided in Section 7638 of the Family Code.

(2) The petition or pleading shall specify the place of birth and residence of the person, the person’s present name, the name proposed, and the reason for the change of name.

(b) In a proceeding for a change of name commenced by the filing of a petition, if the person whose name is to be changed is under 18 years of age, the petition shall, if neither parent of the person has signed the petition, name, as far as known to the person proposing the name change, the parents of the person and their place of residence, if living, or, if neither parent is living, near relatives of the person, and their place of residence.

(c) In a proceeding for a change of name commenced by the filing of a petition, if the person whose name is proposed to be changed is under 18 years of age and the petition is signed by only one parent, the petition shall specify the address, if known, of the other parent if living. If the petition is signed by a guardian, the petition shall specify the name and address, if known, of the parent or parents, if living, or the grandparents, if the
 addresses of both parents are unknown or if both parents are deceased, of the person whose name is proposed to be changed.

(d) In a proceeding for a change of name commenced by the filing of a petition, if the person whose name is proposed to be changed is 12 years of age or older, has been relinquished to an adoption agency by the person’s parent or parents, and has not been legally adopted, the petition shall be signed by the person and the adoption agency to which the person was relinquished. The near relatives of the person and their place of residence shall not be included in the petition unless they are known to the person whose name is proposed to be changed.

(e) All petitions for the change of the name of a minor submitted by a guardian appointed by the juvenile court or the probate court, by a court-appointed dependency attorney appointed as guardian ad litem pursuant to
 rules adopted under Section 326.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or by an attorney for a minor who is alleged or adjudged to be a person described in Section 601 or 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be made in the court having jurisdiction over the minor. All petitions for the change of name of a nonminor dependent may be made in the juvenile court.

(f) If the petition is signed by a guardian, the petition shall specify relevant information regarding the guardianship, the likelihood that the child will remain under the guardian’s care until the child reaches the age of majority, and information suggesting that the child will not likely be returned to the custody of the child’s parents.

(g) (1) On or after January 1, 2023, an application for a change of name may be made to a superior court for a person whose name is proposed to be changed, even if the person
 does not reside within the State of California, if the person is seeking to change their name on at least one of the following documents:

(A) A birth certificate that was issued within this state to the person whose name is proposed to be changed.

(B) A birth certificate that was issued within this state to the legal child of the person whose name is proposed to be changed.

(C) A marriage license and certificate or a confidential marriage license and certificate that was issued within this state to the person whose name is proposed to be changed.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, the superior court in the county where the birth under subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) occurred or marriage under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) was entered
 shall be a proper venue for the proceeding. The name change shall be adjudicated in accordance with California law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 577, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 218)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1277.

(a) (1) If a proceeding for a change of name is commenced by the filing of a petition, except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), and (f), or Section 1277.5, the court shall thereupon make an order reciting the filing of the petition, the name of the person by whom it is filed, and the name proposed. The order shall direct all persons interested in the matter to appear before the court at a time and place specified, which shall be not less than 6 weeks nor more than 12 weeks from the time of making the order, unless the court orders a different time, to show cause why the application for change of name should not be granted. The order shall direct all persons interested in the matter to make known any objection that they may have to the granting of the petition for change of name by filing a written
 objection, which includes the reasons for the objection, with the court at least two court days before the matter is scheduled to be heard and by appearing in court at the hearing to show cause why the petition for change of name should not be granted. The order shall state that, if no written objection is timely filed, the court may grant the petition without a hearing.

(2) (A) A copy of the order to show cause shall be published pursuant to Section 6064 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation to be designated in the order published in the county. If a newspaper of general circulation is not published in the county, a copy of the order to show cause shall be posted by the clerk of the court in three of the most public places in the county in which the court is located, for a like period. Proof shall be made to the satisfaction of the court of this publication or posting at the time of the hearing of
 the application.

(B) (i) On or after January 1, 2023, if the person whose name is proposed to be changed does not live in the county where the petition is filed, pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1276, the copy of the order to show cause shall be published pursuant to Section 6064 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county of the person’s residence. If a newspaper of general circulation is not published in the county of the person’s residence, a copy of the order to show cause shall be posted by the clerk of the court in the county of the person’s residence or a similarly situated local official in three of the most public places in the county of the person’s residence, for a like period. If the place where the person seeking the name change lives does not have counties, publication shall be made according to the requirements of this paragraph in the local subdivision or territory of the person’s
 residence. Proof shall be made to the satisfaction of the court of this publication or posting at the time of the hearing of the application.

(ii) If the person is unable to publish or post a copy of the order to show cause pursuant to clause (i), the court may allow an alternate method of publication or posting or may waive this requirement after sufficient evidence of diligent efforts to publish or post a copy of the order has been submitted to the satisfaction of the court.

(3) Four weekly publications shall be sufficient publication of the order to show cause. If the order is published in a daily newspaper, publication once a week for four successive weeks shall be sufficient.

(4) If a petition has been filed for a minor by a parent and the other parent, if living, does not join in consenting thereto, the
 petitioner shall cause, not less than 30 days before the hearing, to be served notice of the time and place of the hearing or a copy of the order to show cause on the other parent pursuant to Section 413.10, 414.10, 415.10, or 415.40. If notice of the hearing cannot reasonably be accomplished pursuant to Section 415.10 or 415.40, the court may order that notice be given in a manner that the court determines is reasonably calculated to give actual notice to the nonconsenting parent. In that case, if the court determines that notice by publication is reasonably calculated to give actual notice to the nonconsenting parent, the court may determine that publication of the order to show cause pursuant to this subdivision is sufficient notice to the nonconsenting parent.

(b) (1) If the petition for a change of name alleges a reason or circumstance described in paragraph (2), and the petitioner has established that the petitioner
 is an active participant in the address confidentiality program created pursuant to Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 6205) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, and that the name the petitioner is seeking to acquire is on file with the Secretary of State, the action for a change of name is exempt from the requirement for publication of the order to show cause under subdivision (a), and the petition and the order of the court shall, in lieu of reciting the proposed name, indicate that the proposed name is confidential and is on file with the Secretary of State pursuant to the provisions of the address confidentiality program.

(2) The procedure described in paragraph (1) applies to petitions alleging any of the following reasons or circumstances:

(A) To avoid domestic violence, as defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code.

(B) To avoid stalking, as defined in Section 646.9 of the Penal Code.

(C) To avoid sexual assault, as defined in Section 1036.2 of the Evidence Code.

(D) To avoid human trafficking, as defined in Section 236.1 of the Penal Code.

(3) For any petition under this subdivision, the current legal name of the petitioner shall be kept confidential by the court and shall not be published or posted in the court’s calendars, indexes, or register of actions, as required by Article 7 (commencing with Section 69840) of Chapter 5 of Title 8 of the Government Code, or by any means or in any public forum, including a hardcopy or an electronic copy, or any other type of public media or display.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), the court may, at the request of the petitioner, issue an order reciting the name of the petitioner at the time of the filing of the petition and the new legal name of the petitioner as a result of the court’s granting of the petition.

(5) A petitioner may request that the court file the petition and any other papers associated with the proceeding under seal. The court may consider the request at the same time as the petition for name change, and may grant the request in any case in which the court finds that all of the following factors apply:

(A) There exists an overriding interest that overcomes the right of public access to the record.

(B) The overriding interest supports sealing the record.

(C) A
 substantial probability exists that the overriding interest will be prejudiced if the record is not sealed.

(D) The proposed order to seal the records is narrowly tailored.

(E) No less restrictive means exist to achieve the overriding interest.

(c) If the petition is filed for a minor or nonminor dependent who is under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, the action for a change of name is exempt from the requirement for publication of the order to show cause under subdivision (a).

(d) A proceeding for a change of name for a witness participating in the state Witness Relocation and Assistance Program established by Title 7.5 (commencing with Section 14020) of Part 4 of the Penal Code who has been approved for the change of name by the program is
 exempt from the requirement for publication of the order to show cause under subdivision (a).

(e) If an application for change of name is brought as part of an action under the Uniform Parentage Act (Part 3 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 12 of the Family Code), whether as part of a petition or cross-complaint or as a separate order to show cause in a pending action thereunder, service of the application shall be made upon all other parties to the action in a like manner as prescribed for the service of a summons, as set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 415.10) of Chapter 4 of Title 5 of Part 2. Upon the setting of a hearing on the issue, notice of the hearing shall be given to all parties in the action in a like manner and within the time limits prescribed generally for the type of hearing (whether trial or order to show cause) at which the issue of the change of name is to be decided.

(f) If a guardian files a petition to change the name of the guardian’s minor ward pursuant to Section 1276:

(1) The guardian shall provide notice of the hearing to any living parent of the minor by personal service at least 30 days before the hearing.

(2) If either or both parents are deceased or cannot be located, the guardian shall cause, not less than 30 days before the hearing, to be served a notice of the time and place of the hearing or a copy of the order to show cause on the child’s grandparents, if living, pursuant to Section 413.10, 414.10, 415.10, or 415.40.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 577, Sec. 2.5.   (AB 218)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1277.5.

(a) (1) If a proceeding for a change of name to conform the petitioner’s name to the petitioner’s gender identity is commenced by the filing of a petition, the court shall thereupon make an order reciting the filing of the petition, the name of the person by whom it is filed, and the name proposed. The order shall direct all persons interested in the matter to make known any objection to the change of name by filing a written objection, which includes any reasons for the objection, within six weeks of the making of the order, and shall state that if no objection showing good cause to oppose the name change is timely filed, the court shall, without hearing, enter the order that the change of name is granted.

(2) If a petition is filed to change
 the name of a minor to conform to gender identity that does not include the signatures of both living parents, the petition and the order to show cause made in accordance with paragraph (1) shall be served on the parent who did not sign the petition, pursuant to Section 413.10, 414.10, 415.10, or 415.40, within 30 days from the date on which the order is made by the court. If service cannot reasonably be accomplished pursuant to Section 415.10 or 415.40, the court may order that service be accomplished in a manner that the court determines is reasonably calculated to give actual notice to the parent who did not sign the petition.

(b) The proceeding for a change of name to conform the petitioner’s name to the petitioner’s gender identity is exempt from any requirement for publication.

(c) A hearing date shall not be set in the proceeding unless an objection is timely filed and
 shows good cause for opposing the name change. Objections based solely on concerns that the proposed change is not the petitioner’s actual gender identity or gender assigned at birth shall not constitute good cause. At the hearing, the court may examine under oath any of the petitioners, remonstrants, or other persons touching the petition or application, and may make an order changing the name or dismissing the petition or application as the court may deem right and proper.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 723, Sec. 1.   (AB 1084)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

1277.5.

(a) If a proceeding for a change of name to conform an adult petitioner’s name to their gender identity is commenced by the filing of a petition, the court shall, without hearing and within six weeks of the petition’s filing, enter an order that the change of name is granted, except as provided in Section 1279.5.

(b) (1) If a proceeding for a change of name to conform a minor petitioner’s name to their gender identity is commenced by the filing of a petition, and that petition includes the signatures of all of the minor’s living parents, the court shall, without hearing and within six weeks of the filing of the petition, enter an order that the change of name is granted, except as provided in Section 1279.5.

(2) (A) If a proceeding for change of name to conform a minor petitioner’s name to their gender identity is commenced by the filing of a petition, and that petition does not include the signatures of all of the minor’s living parents, the court shall make an order reciting the filing of the petition, the name of the person by whom it is filed, and the name proposed.

(B) The order shall direct all persons interested in the matter to make known any objection to the change of name by filing a written objection, which includes any reasons for the objection, within six weeks of the making of the order, and shall state that if no objection showing good cause to oppose the name change is timely filed, the court shall, without hearing, enter the order that the change of name is granted after the completion of the six weeks, except as provided in Section 1279.5.

(C) The petition and the order shall be served on any parent who did not sign the petition, pursuant to Section 413.10, 414.10, 415.10, or 415.40, within four weeks from the date on which the order is made by the court. If service cannot reasonably be accomplished pursuant to Section 415.10 or 415.40, the court may order that service be accomplished in a manner that the court determines is reasonably calculated to give actual notice to the parent who did not sign the petition.

(D) A hearing date shall not be set in the proceeding unless an objection is timely filed and shows good cause for opposing the name change. Objections based solely on concerns that the proposed change is not the petitioner’s actual gender identity or gender assigned at birth shall not constitute good cause. At the hearing, the court may examine under oath any of the petitioners, remonstrants, or other persons
 touching the petition or application, and may make an order changing the name or dismissing the petition or application as the court may deem right and proper.

(c) The proceeding for a change of name to conform the petitioner’s name to the petitioner’s gender identity is exempt from any requirement for publication.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 723, Sec. 2.   (AB 1084)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1278.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), the petition or application shall be heard at the time designated by the court, only if objections are filed by a person who can, in those objections, show to the court good cause against the change of name. At the hearing, the court may examine on oath any of the petitioners, remonstrants, or other persons touching the petition or application,
 and may make an order changing the name, or dismissing the petition or application, as the court may deem right and proper.

(2) If no objection is filed at least two court days before the date set for hearing, the court may, without hearing, enter the order that the change of name is granted.

(b) If the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 1277 apply, the court shall not disclose the proposed name unless the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the allegations of domestic violence, stalking, or sexual assault in the petition are false.
